Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 28

Tennessee Small Business Investment Company Credit Act

4-28-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Small Business Investment Company Credit Act.”

Acts 2009, ch. 610, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 28, §§4-28-101 —4-28-127 (Acts 1977, ch. 303, §§ 1-16, 20-24, 27, 28; T.C.A., §§ 4-2801 — 4-2825; Acts 1979, ch. 327, § 1; 1981, ch. 142, §§ 1-6, 8-18; 1982, ch. 939, §§ 1, 2), concerning energy development, management and conservation, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 1. Section4-28-107 had previously been repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 142, § 7. For provisions concerning the office of energy programs of the department of economic and community development, see §§4-3-510 —4-3-515 and §§4-3-714 —4-3-730. For provisions concerning the office of energy management of the department of finance and administration, see title 4, chapter 3, part 10.

4-28-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Affiliate” means:

Any person who, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns, controls or holds the power to vote fifteen percent (15%) or more of the outstanding voting securities or other voting ownership interest of a TNInvestco or insurance company; or

Any person, fifteen percent (15%) or more of whose outstanding voting securities or other voting ownership interests are directly or indirectly beneficially owned, controlled or held with power to vote by a TNInvestco or insurance company;

Notwithstanding this subdivision (1), an investment by a participating investor in a TNInvestco pursuant to an allocation of investment tax credits under this section does not cause that TNInvestco to become an affiliate of that participating investor;

“Allocation amount” means the total amount of tax credits allocated to the participating investors in a qualified TNInvestco pursuant to this chapter;

“Allocation date” means the date on which investment tax credits under § 4-28-105 are allocated to the participating investor of a qualified TNInvestco under this chapter;

“Base investment amount” means fourteen million dollars ($14,000,000) in the case of a qualified TNInvestco receiving one (1) allocation of tax credits and twenty eight million dollars ($28,000,000) in the case of a qualified TNInvestco receiving two (2) allocations of tax credits, which must be available in cash or cash equivalents immediately following the investment by a TNInvestco's participating investors and its owners; provided, however, that a contract for payment of cash or cash equivalents over a specified period of time shall also be sufficient;

“Designated capital” means an amount of money that is invested by a participating investor in a qualified TNInvestco;

“Investment period” means the period January 1, 2010, through December 31, 2019;

“Minority-owned business” means a business that is wholly owned, or at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the assets or outstanding stock of which is owned, by one (1) or more individuals who are members of any racial or ethnic minority within the state and whose management and daily business operations are under the control of one (1) or more members of any racial or ethnic minority within the state;

“Participating investor” means any insurance company required to pay the gross premiums tax pursuant to § 56-4-205 that contributes designated capital pursuant to this chapter;

“Person” means any natural person or entity, including, but not limited to, a corporation, general or limited partnership, trust or limited liability company;

“Profit share percentage” means a fee paid to the state by a qualified TNInvestco as provided in § 4-28-109 in an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of all distributions or payments made by a qualified TNInvestco that are not classified as qualified distributions, other than distributions or repayments of capital contributions by the TNInvestco's equity owners who are not participating investors;

“Qualified business” means a business that is independently owned and operated and meets all of the following requirements:

It is headquartered in this state, its principal business operations are located in this state, and at least sixty percent (60%) of its employees are located in this state;

It has not more than one hundred (100) employees;

It is not principally engaged in:

Professional services provided by accountants, doctors or lawyers;

Banking or lending;

Real estate development;

Insurance;

Oil and gas exploration; or

Gambling activities; and

It is not a franchise of and has no financial relationship with a TNInvestco or any affiliate of a TNInvestco prior to a TNInvestco's first qualified investment in the business; provided, however, that if the TNInvestco continues to fulfill its fiduciary duty to the program established by this chapter, then the business can be one in which the TNInvestco, its affiliates, or a separate fund managed by the managers of the TNInvestco was invested prior to the allocation of investment tax credits to the TNInvestco; and provided, further, that if the TNInvestco continues to fulfill its fiduciary duty to the program established by this chapter, then the business can be one in which a separate fund managed by the managers of the TNInvestco makes an investment after the investment by the TNInvestco;

(i) The requirements of subdivision (11)(A)(i) may, in the alternative, be met if the qualified TNInvestco represents in its application for funding approval that the business will, in the definitive purchase agreements to be executed upon closing, agree to:

Commence locating its headquarters, its principal business operations, and at least sixty percent (60%) of its employees in Tennessee; and

Complete all of the required elements of subdivision (11)(A)(i) within twelve (12) months after closing;

If the business fails to fulfill the commitments specified in subdivision (11)(B)(i), then the commissioner of economic and community development may, in the commissioner's sole discretion, impose on the TNInvestco the following penalty. Notwithstanding subdivision (10) to the contrary, under the penalty authorized by this subdivision (11)(B)(ii), the profit share percentage, as otherwise defined in subdivision (10), shall be amended such that the fee paid to the state by the qualified TNInvestco in connection with the business shall equal eighty percent (80%), rather than fifty percent (50%), of any distributions arising from the TNInvestco's investment in the business, other than qualified distributions or distributions or repayments of capital contributions by the TNInvestco's equity owners who are not participating investors;

A business classified as a qualified business at the time of the first qualified investment in the business will remain classified as a qualified business and may receive continuing qualified investments from any TNInvestco; provided, that the business continues to meet the requirements of subdivision (11)(A)(i);

“Qualified distribution” means any distribution or payment by a qualified TNInvestco in connection with the following:

Costs and expenses of forming, syndicating and organizing the qualified TNInvestco, including fees paid for professional services; provided, however, that start up costs shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000);

An annual management fee to offset the costs and expenses of managing and operating a qualified TNInvestco; provided, however, that in the first four (4) years following its allocation date, a qualified TNInvestco's management fee shall not exceed two percent (2%) of its base investment amount per annum and in the fifth through tenth years following its allocation date, a qualified TNInvestco's management fee per annum shall not exceed two percent (2%) of the lesser of its base investment amount or its qualified investments;

Reasonable and necessary fees in accordance with industry custom for ongoing professional services, including, but not limited to, legal and accounting services related to the operation of a qualified TNInvestco not including any lobbying or governmental relations; provided, however, that professional service fees shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) annually;

An increase or projected increase in federal or state taxes of the equity owners of a TNInvestco resulting from the earnings or other tax liability of a TNInvestco to the extent that the increase is related to the ownership, management or operation of a TNInvestco; provided, however, that such distributions shall not exceed that actual tax liability due and payable on such investor's actual return. Documents supporting such payments must be provided to the commissioner of revenue upon request; or

Payments to the TNInvestco's equity owners who are not participating investors; provided, that no such payments shall reduce the base amount for other purposes of this chapter without regard to the early or seed stage multiplier;

“Qualified investment” means the investment of cash by a qualified TNInvestco in a qualified business for the purchase of equity, equity options, warrants, or debt convertible to equity. An investment by a qualified TNInvestco in a debt instrument whose terms are substantially equivalent to terms typically found in debt financing provided by banks to profitable companies, such as security interests in tangible assets with readily discernable orderly liquidation value in excess of the loan amount and/or personal guarantees, shall not be deemed as a qualified investment. Qualified investments determined to be seed or early stage investments shall be increased by three hundred percent (300%) for purposes of determining if a qualified TNInvestco meets the investment thresholds in §4-28-106;

“Qualified TNInvestco” means a TNInvestco that has been approved to receive an investment tax credit allocation;

“Seed or early stage investment” means an investment in a company that has a product or service in testing or pilot production that may or may not be commercially available. The company may or may not be generating revenues and may have been in business less than three (3) years at the time of investment;

“State premium tax liability” means any liability incurred by an insurance company under §56-4-205 or in the case of a repeal or a reduction by the state of the liability imposed by §56-4-205, any other tax liability imposed upon an insurance company by the state;

“TNInvestco” means a partnership, corporation, trust or limited liability company, whether organized on a for-profit or not-for-profit basis that completes the application process in §4-28-104 and that is certified by the department of economic and community development as meeting the established criteria; and

“Woman-owned business” means a business that is wholly owned, or at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the assets or outstanding stock of which is owned, by one (1) or more women and whose management and daily business operations are under the control of one (1) or more women.

Acts 2009, ch. 610, § 3; 2010, ch. 1142, §§ 1-5, 15, 24, 25.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 28, §§4-28-101 —4-28-127 (Acts 1977, ch. 303, §§ 1-16, 20-24, 27, 28; T.C.A., §§ 4-2801 — 4-2825; Acts 1979, ch. 327, § 1; 1981, ch. 142, §§ 1-6, 8-18; 1982, ch. 939, §§ 1, 2), concerning energy development, management and conservation, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 1. Section4-28-107 had previously been repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 142, § 7. For provisions concerning the office of energy programs of the department of economic and community development, see §§4-3-510 —4-3-514 and §§4-3-714 —4-3-730. For provisions concerning the office of energy management of the department of finance and administration, see title 4, chapter 3, part 10.

Acts 2010, ch. 1142, § 33 provided that the act shall apply to any entity certified as a TNInvestco, and to tax credits awarded, on or after July 9, 2009.

4-28-103. Participating investor’s investment tax credit — Limits — Payment of retaliatory tax not required — Credits against other taxes.

A participating investor shall earn an investment tax credit against its state premium tax liability equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the investment tax credit allocated to the participating investor under § 4-28-105. The participating investor's investment tax credit shall be earned and vested upon making its investment in the qualified TNInvestco. Beginning January 1, 2012, a participating investor may claim the investment tax credit as follows:

In tax years 2012, 2013, 2014, and 2015, an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%) of the investment tax credit allocated to the participating investor; and

In tax years 2016, 2017, 2018 and 2019, an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the investment tax credit allocated to the participating investor.

No participating investor's investment tax credit for any taxable year shall exceed the participating investor's state premium tax liability for such year. If the amount of the investment tax credit determined under this section for any taxable year exceeds the state premium tax liability, then the excess shall be an investment tax credit carryover to future taxable years until tax year 2037. Investment tax credits may be used in connection with both final payments and prepayments of a participating investor's state premium tax liability. Investment tax credits may be sold or otherwise transferred by a participating investor to another entity, which can likewise resell or transfer the tax credits; provided, that the department of revenue receives written notification within thirty (30) days of any sale or transfer.

A participating investor claiming an investment tax credit under this section is not required to pay any additional retaliatory tax levied as a result of claiming the investment tax credit.

A participating investor is not required to reduce the amount of tax pursuant to the state premium tax liability included by the participating investor in connection with ratemaking for any insurance contract written in this state because of a reduction in the participating investor's tax liability based on the investment tax credit allowed under this section.

If the taxes paid by a participating investor with respect to its state premium tax liability constitute a credit against any other tax that is imposed by this state, the participating investor's credit against the other tax shall not be reduced by virtue of the reduction in the participating investor's tax liability based on the investment tax credit allowed under this section.

Acts 2009, ch. 610, § 4; 2010, ch. 1142, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 28, §§4-28-101 —4-28-127 (Acts 1977, ch. 303, §§ 1-16, 20-24, 27, 28; T.C.A., §§ 4-2801 — 4-2825; Acts 1979, ch. 327, § 1; 1981, ch. 142, §§ 1-6, 8-18; 1982, ch. 939, §§ 1, 2), concerning energy development, management and conservation, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 1. Section4-28-107 had previously been repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 142, § 7. For provisions concerning the office of energy programs of the department of economic and community development, see §§4-3-510 —4-3-515 and §§4-3-714 —4-3-730. For provisions concerning the office of energy management of the department of finance and administration, see title 4, chapter 3, part 10.

Acts 2010, ch. 1142, § 33 provided that the act shall apply to any entity certified as a TNInvestco, and to tax credits awarded, on or after July 9, 2009.

4-28-104. Standardized format for qualification — Qualification requirements — Determination of satisfaction of requirements — Issuance of certification or refusal — Submission of applications.

The department of economic and community development, in consultation with the department of revenue, shall provide a standardized format for persons attempting to qualify as a TNInvestco.

An applicant for qualification is required to:

File an application with the department of economic and community development;

Pay a nonrefundable application fee of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) at the time of filing the application; and

Submit as part of its application an audited balance sheet that contains an unqualified opinion of an independent certified public accountant issued not more than sixty (60) days before the application date that states that the applicant has an equity capitalization of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more in the form of unencumbered cash, marketable securities or other liquid assets.

The department of economic and community development and the department of revenue must review the organizational documents of each applicant for certification and determine whether the applicant has satisfied the requirements of this chapter.

Within thirty (30) days after the receipt of an application, the department of economic and community development shall issue the certification or refuse the certification and communicate in detail to the applicant the grounds for refusal, including suggestions for the removal of such grounds.

The department of economic and community development must begin accepting applications to become a TNInvestco by August 1, 2009. All applications must be submitted to the department of economic and community development no later than the close of business on October 1, 2009.

Any information received, created, or promulgated by the department of economic and community development or the department of revenue pursuant to this section on or after July 9, 2009, shall constitute a public record, as defined in § 10-7-503, and shall be open for personal inspection by any citizen of this state.

Any information received, created, or promulgated by the department of economic and community development or the department of revenue pursuant to this section shall not:

Constitute “tax information” or “tax administration information”, as defined in § 67-1-1701, and shall not be subject to title 67, chapter 1, part 17; or

Be subject to § 4-3-730.

If the general assembly subsequently authorizes an allocation of investment tax credits in addition to the two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) authorized by § 4-28-105(f) and by Chapter 610 of the Public Acts of 2009, the department of revenue and the department of economic and community development, in reviewing the organizational documents of each applicant for certification and determining whether the applicant has satisfied the requirements of this chapter pursuant to subsection (c), shall additionally take into consideration the applicant's involvement of women and minorities.

Acts 2009, ch. 610, § 5; 2010, ch. 1142, §§ 7, 31.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 28, §§4-28-101 —4-28-127 (Acts 1977, ch. 303, §§ 1-16, 20-24, 27, 28; T.C.A., §§ 4-2801 — 4-2825; Acts 1979, ch. 327, § 1; 1981, ch. 142, §§ 1-6, 8-18; 1982, ch. 939, §§ 1, 2), concerning energy development, management and conservation, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 1. Section4-28-107 had previously been repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 142, § 7. For provisions concerning the office of energy programs of the department of economic and community development, see §§4-3-510 —4-3-515 and §§4-3-714 —4-3-730. For provisions concerning the office of energy management of the department of finance and administration, see title 4, chapter 3, part 10.

Acts 2010, ch. 1142, § 33 provided that the act shall apply to any entity certified as a TNInvestco, and to tax credits awarded, on or after July 9, 2009.

4-28-105. Standardized format for TNInvestco to apply for investment tax credits — Information required in applications — Submission of irrevocable investment commitments — Penalty for failure to perform — Review of applications — Criteria — Aggregate amount of investment tax credits to be allocated — Deadline for approval.

The department of economic and community development, in consultation with the department of revenue must provide a standardized format for a TNInvestco to apply for the investment tax credits.

Applications shall contain such information as required by the department of revenue and the department of economic and community development, including statements regarding the ability to obtain the required investment commitments. Each TNInvestco shall submit irrevocable investment commitments from participating investors and TNInvestco owners in an aggregate amount equal to at least the base investment amount not later than November 30, 2009. TNInvestcos that are awarded investment tax credits under this chapter based on the asserted ability to raise the required capital shall be subject to a fifty-thousand-dollar ($50,000) penalty for failure to perform. The proceeds from any such penalty shall be deposited into the Tennessee rural opportunity fund to further the state's economic development efforts.

The department of revenue and the department of economic and community development, in consultation with the Tennessee Technology Development Corporation, shall review the applications and award the investment tax credits based on the overall strength of the application using the following criteria:

The applicant has at least two (2) investment managers with five (5) or more years of investment experience;

The applicant has been based, as defined by having a principal office, in this state for at least five (5) years or has at least five (5) years of experience in investing primarily in Tennessee domiciled companies;

The applicant's proposed investment strategy for achieving transformational economic development outcomes through focused investments of capital in seed or early stage companies with high-growth potential; and

The applicant's demonstrated ability to lead investment rounds, advise and mentor entrepreneurs and facilitate follow-on investments.

TNInvestcos that do not meet the criteria in subdivision (c)(1)(A)(ii) may submit a joint application with an entity that meets the criteria set out in subdivision (c)(1)(A)(ii), and such application shall be judged based on the combined attributes of the joint application.

The awarding of investment tax credits shall be in the sole discretion of the commissioner of revenue and the commissioner of economic and community development.

The aggregate amount of investment tax credits to be allocated to all participating investors of qualified TNInvestcos under this chapter shall not exceed one hundred twenty million dollars ($120,000,000). The investment tax credits will be awarded in twenty-million-dollar ($20,000,000) allocations. No TNInvestco, on an aggregate basis with its joint applicants, may apply for more than two (2) twenty-million-dollar ($20,000,000) allocations.

The TNInvestco will receive, no later than December 31, 2009, a written notice from the department of economic and community development stating whether or not it has been approved as a qualified TNInvestco and, if applicable, stating the amount of its investment tax credit allocation.

Notwithstanding subsection (d), the commissioner of revenue and the commissioner of economic and community development are authorized to allocate additional investment tax credits in the total amount of eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) such that the aggregate amount of investment tax credits to be allocated under this chapter shall not exceed two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000). Such additional investment tax credits shall consist of four (4) twenty-million-dollar allocations, which shall be awarded, respectively, to the four (4) TNInvestcos, chosen as finalists by the commissioner of revenue and the commissioner of economic and community development during the selection process set out in subsections (a)-(e), that did not receive an allocation of investment tax credits under subsection (d). Final allocation of such tax credits to such TNInvestcos shall occur after the TNInvestcos have obtained irrevocable investment commitments from participating investors and TNInvestco owners in an aggregate amount equal to at least the base investment amount. The tax credits awarded pursuant to this section shall be syndicated in a manner approved by the state treasurer and the commissioner of economic and community development. Any contract to sell tax credits, entered on or after June 30, 2010, in a manner that has not been approved by the state treasurer and the commissioner of economic and community development shall be voidable in the sole discretion of the state treasurer.

If the general assembly subsequently authorizes an allocation of investment tax credits in addition to the two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) authorized by subsection (f) and by chapter 610 of the Public Acts of 2009, in reviewing applications and awarding such credits, the commissioner of revenue and the commissioner of economic and community development shall strive to select applicants whose investment team membership is reflective of the racial, ethnic and gender diversity of Tennessee's population.

Acts 2009, ch. 610, § 6; 2010, ch. 1142, §§ 8, 9, 32.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 28, §§4-28-101 —4-28-127 (Acts 1977, ch. 303, §§ 1-16, 20-24, 27, 28; T.C.A., §§ 4-2801 — 4-2825; Acts 1979, ch. 327, § 1; 1981, ch. 142, §§ 1-6, 8-18; 1982, ch. 939, §§ 1, 2), concerning energy development, management and conservation, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 1. Section4-28-107 had previously been repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 142, § 7. For provisions concerning the office of energy programs of the department of economic and community development, see §§4-3-510 —4-3-515 and § 4-3-714 —4-3-730. For provisions concerning the office of energy management of the department of general services, see §§4-3-1107 —4-3-1111.

Acts 2010, ch. 1142, § 33 provided that the act shall apply to any entity certified as a TNInvestco, and to tax credits awarded, on or after July 9, 2009.

4-28-106. Maintaining certification — Penalty for failure to meet performance measures — Request for written determination that proposed investment will qualify as a qualified investment in a qualified business or a seed or early stage investment.

To maintain its certification, a qualified TNInvestco shall make qualified investments, as follows:

Within two (2) years after the allocation date, a qualified TNInvestco shall have invested an amount equal to at least fifty percent (50%) of its base investment amount in qualified investments;

Within three (3) years after the allocation date, a qualified TNInvestco shall have invested an amount equal to at least seventy percent (70%) of its base investment amount in qualified investments;

Within four (4) years after the allocation date, a qualified TNInvestco shall have invested an amount equal to at least eighty percent (80%) of its base investment amount in qualified investments; and

Within six (6) years or any year thereafter the allocation date, a qualified TNInvestco shall have invested an amount equal to at least ninety percent (90%) of its base investment amount in qualified investments.

Not more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the investment amounts required by subdivisions (a)(1)(A)(i)-(iv) shall be attributable to the three-hundred-percent (300%) seed or early-stage multiplier.

Failure to meet the performance measures set out in subdivision (a)(1) during any calendar year shall result in a two-hundred-fifty-thousand-dollar penalty fee against the qualified TNInvestco. The proceeds from any such penalty fee shall be deposited into the Tennessee rural opportunity fund to further the state's economic development efforts. Funds related to the investment tax credit shall not be used to pay the penalty fee imposed under this subdivision (a)(2).

Prior to making a proposed qualified investment in a specific business, a qualified TNInvestco must request from the department of economic and community development a written determination that the proposed investment will qualify as a qualified investment in a qualified business or, if applicable, a seed or early stage investment. The department shall notify a qualified TNInvestco within ten (10) business days from the receipt of a request of its determination. If the department fails to notify the qualified TNInvestco of its determination within ten (10) business days, the proposed investment will be deemed to be a qualified investment in a qualified business and, if applicable, a seed or early stage investment. If the department determines that the proposed investment does not meet the definition of a qualified investment, qualified business, or seed or early stage investment, the department may nevertheless consider the proposed investment a qualified investment, or a seed or early stage investment, and if necessary, the business a qualified business, if the department determines that the proposed investment will further state economic development.

All designated capital not invested in qualified investments by a qualified TNInvestco shall be held in an escrow account maintained by the state and administered through the department of economic and community development.

A qualified TNInvestco may not invest more than fifteen percent (15%) of its designated capital in any one qualified business without the specific approval of the department of economic and community development.

Any amounts that have not been invested by the TNInvestco at the end of the investment period shall be forfeited and paid to the state to support the Tennessee rural opportunity fund. Investment returns, profits and the portion of the base investment amount, may be reinvested until the seventh anniversary of the fund. If a TNInvestco elects to reinvest returns, the TNInvestco shall reinvest the state's and the TNInvestco's returns in equal portions.

No qualified TNInvestco shall sell any interest in a qualified business to an affiliate unless the TNInvestco has first obtained written authorization for the sale from the department of economic and community development.

All qualified TNInvestcos, and the qualified businesses in which they invest, shall strive to maximize the participation of minority-owned businesses and woman-owned businesses to reflect the racial, ethnic and gender diversity of Tennessee's population.

The department of economic and community development shall promote awareness of the program established by this chapter among minority-owned businesses and woman-owned businesses.

The department of economic and community development shall undertake training programs and other educational activities to increase diversity of participation by encouraging minority-owned businesses and woman-owned businesses to apply, compete and qualify for investments under this chapter.

Each TNInvestco shall coordinate its efforts to strive to maximize participation in minority-owned businesses and woman-owned businesses with the efforts of the department of economic and community development.

Each TNInvestco shall provide information on its website concerning this program and the availability of capital to businesses including minority-owned businesses and woman-owned businesses.

Acts 2009, ch. 610, § 7; 2010, ch. 1142, §§ 10-12, 26; 2014, ch. 611, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 28, §§4-28-101 —4-28-127 (Acts 1977, ch. 303, §§ 1-16, 20-24, 27, 28; T.C.A., §§ 4-2801 — 4-2825; Acts 1979, ch. 327, § 1; 1981, ch. 142, §§ 1-6, 8-18; 1982, ch. 939, §§ 1, 2), concerning energy development, management and conservation, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 1. Section4-28-107 had previously been repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 142, § 7. For provisions concerning the office of energy programs of the department of economic and community development, see §§4-3-510 —4-3-515 and §§4-3-714 —4-3-730. For provisions concerning the office of energy management of the department of finance and administration, see title 4, chapter 3, part 10.

Acts 2010, ch. 1142, § 33 provided that the act shall apply to any entity certified as a TNInvestco, and to tax credits awarded, on or after July 9, 2009.

4-28-107. Restrictions on insurance companies and their affiliates.

An insurance company or affiliate of an insurance company shall not, directly or indirectly:

Beneficially own, whether through rights, options, convertible interest or otherwise, fifteen percent (15%) or more of the voting securities or other voting ownership interest of a TNInvestco;

Manage a TNInvestco, other than exercising remedies for default; or

Control the direction of investments for a TNInvestco.

Acts 2009, ch. 610, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 28, §§4-28-101 —4-28-127 (Acts 1977, ch. 303, §§ 1-16, 20-24, 27, 28; T.C.A., §§ 4-2801 — 4-2825; Acts 1979, ch. 327, § 1; 1981, ch. 142, §§ 1-6, 8-18; 1982, ch. 939, §§ 1, 2), concerning energy development, management and conservation, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 1. Section4-28-107 had previously been repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 142, § 7. For provisions concerning the office of energy programs of the department of economic and community development, see §§4-3-510 —4-3-515 and §§4-3-714 —4-3-730. For provisions concerning the office of energy management of the department of finance and administration, see title 4, chapter 3, part 10.

4-28-108. Distributions from qualified TNInvestco.

Qualified distributions from a qualified TNInvestco may be made at any time.

Distributions other than qualified distributions from a qualified TNInvestco may be paid out annually or upon designated liquidity events as established by the qualified TNInvestco. Any such distributions other than qualified distributions may not reduce the base investment amount during any calendar year.

The profit share percentage shall be paid to the state in the same time and manner as all other distributions as provided in § 4-28-109. Any such payments shall be deposited into the general fund or the rural opportunity fund and the small and minority-owned business assistance program fund as provided in § 4-28-109.

Investment capital liquidated during a liquidity event will be given a one-year redeployment period for purposes of calculating the investment thresholds in § 4-28-106.

The department of economic and community development shall ensure, pursuant to the authority provided in this chapter, that a qualified TNInvestco provides adequate documentary support for all proceeds and distributions related to liquidity events and the department shall use best efforts to confirm that all information provided to the department by the TNInvestco is accurate so the department may ensure that all parties involved receive the proper designated share. Information provided to the department pursuant to this section shall be kept confidential due to the proprietary nature of such information.

Acts 2009, ch. 610, § 9; 2010, ch. 1142, § 27; 2014, ch. 611, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 28, §§4-28-101 —4-28-127 (Acts 1977, ch. 303, §§ 1-16, 20-24, 27, 28; T.C.A., §§ 4-2801 — 4-2825; Acts 1979, ch. 327, § 1; 1981, ch. 142, §§ 1-6, 8-18; 1982, ch. 939, §§ 1, 2), concerning energy development, management and conservation, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 1. Section4-28-107 had previously been repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 142, § 7. For provisions concerning the office of energy programs of the department of economic and community development, see §§4-3-510 —4-3-515 and §§4-3-714 —4-3-730. For provisions concerning the office of energy management of the department of finance and administration, see title 4, chapter 3, part 10.

Acts 2010, ch. 1142, § 33 provided that the act shall apply to any entity certified as a TNInvestco, and to tax credits awarded, on or after July 9, 2009.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

4-28-109. Payment of profit share percentage — Transfers from the general fund to the Tennessee rural opportunity fund and the small and minority owned business assistance program fund — Distribution of investment returns — Minimizing any related federal tax obligation.

At any time that the TNInvestco makes distributions, other than qualified distributions or distributions representing repayments of capital contributions, to its equity investors, the qualified TNInvestco shall pay to the state the profit share percentage. Any such payments shall be deposited into the general fund until such time as the department of finance and administration certifies that the total amount of payments deposited in the general fund equals the total amount of revenue forgone pursuant to the credits used as provided in § 4-28-103. Any payments made in excess of the amount of revenue forgone shall be deposited into the Tennessee rural opportunity fund and the small and minority-owned business assistance program fund to further support the state's economic development efforts.

The department shall obtain all necessary information from each TNInvestco to support the state's profit share percentage. Information provided to the department pursuant to this section shall be kept confidential due to the proprietary nature of such information.

After the department of finance and administration has provided its certification pursuant to subdivision (a)(1), any additional state revenue generated and deposited into the general fund as a result of this chapter through sales and use taxes, franchise and excise taxes, business taxes or any other source of revenue shall be identified by the department of revenue. The amount of this additional revenue shall be certified by the department of revenue on an annual basis and an amount equivalent to the certified amount shall be transferred from the general fund and seventy-five percent (75%) of such amount shall be transferred to the Tennessee rural opportunity fund and twenty-five percent (25%) of such amount shall be transferred to the small and minority-owned business assistance program fund.

Following the seventh anniversary of the fund, investment returns (profits and the portion of the base investment amount) may be distributed as liquidity permits; provided, that no more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the TNInvestco's base amount may be distributed in any one (1) year until the end of the investment period, at which time all of the fund's proceeds may be distributed as liquidity permits.

The TNInvestco and the state shall structure the qualified distributions and final payments in a manner that minimizes any related federal tax obligation. To the extent that the profit share distribution to qualified TNInvestco investors is less than the state's share, pursuant to the profit share percentage, due to federal income tax liabilities, the final payments may be adjusted to equalize the post-tax profit share payments made during the investment period.

Acts 2009, ch. 610, § 10; 2010, ch. 1142, §§ 28, 29; 2014, ch. 611, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 28, §§4-28-101 —4-28-127 (Acts 1977, ch. 303, §§ 1-16, 20-24, 27, 28; T.C.A., §§ 4-2801 — 4-2825; Acts 1979, ch. 327, § 1; 1981, ch. 142, §§ 1-6, 8-18; 1982, ch. 939, §§ 1, 2), concerning energy development, management and conservation, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 1. Section4-28-107 had previously been repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 142, § 7. For provisions concerning the office of energy programs of the department of economic and community development, see §§4-3-510 —4-3-515 and §§4-3-714 —4-3-730. For provisions concerning the office of energy management of the department of finance and administration, see title 4, chapter 3, part 10.

Acts 2010, ch. 1142, § 33 provided that the act shall apply to any entity certified as a TNInvestco, and to tax credits awarded, on or after July 9, 2009.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.